Washington statutes.
RCW 13.16.070

Bonds may be issued without vote of electors.

In order to carry out the provisions of RCW 13.16.020 through 13.16.080 the several counties affected shall utilize any and all methods available to them by law for financing the program authorized by RCW 13.16.020 through 13.16.080 and may fund any and all debts incurred by the issuance of general obligation bonds of the county in the manner provided by law, without submitting the same to a vote of the people.

[ 1945 c 188 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2004-6.]